Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.260

Costs of conducting nominations and elections—Reimbursement.

The department shall be reimbursed for actual costs incurred in conducting nominations and elections for members of any commodity commission established under the provisions of this chapter. Such reimbursement shall be made from the funds of the commission for which the nominations and elections were conducted by the director.

[ 2002 c 313 s 64; 1969 c 66 s 2; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.260. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 26.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.